West Virginia, session 2026, HB4522.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1D. Banning foreign backed spending on state ballot issues. §3-1D-1  Definitions.For purposes of this article:“Ballot measure” means any state ballot question, proposal, or initiative, including constitutional amendments; or any county or municipal ballot question, proposal, or initiative, including bond issues and levies."Donation" means a payment, gift, subscription, loan, advance, deposit, or anything of value given to a person without consideration."Election administration" means to participate in any way in the process of conducting and implementing an election. Election administration for the purposes of this article does not include post-election canvass, recount, contest and audit processes."Foreign donations" are donations provided by a foreign national."Foreign national" means:(1) An individual who is not a citizen of the United States; (2) A government, or subdivision, of a foreign country or municipality thereof; (3) A political party of a foreign country; or (4) Any entity, such as a partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons, that is organized under the laws of, or has its principal place of business in, a foreign country, and which does not do business in West Virginia."Government entity" means a state, county, local, or municipal government entity or an officer or employee of one of these government entities or a volunteer performing tasks at the same."Knowingly" means that a person must:(1) Have actual knowledge that the source of the funds solicited, accepted or received is from a foreign national;(2) Be aware of facts that would lead a reasonable person to conclude that there is a substantial probability that the source of the funds solicited, accepted, or received is from a foreign national; or(3)  Be aware of facts that would lead a reasonable person to inquire whether the source of the funds solicited, accepted or received is from a foreign national, but the person failed to conduct a reasonable inquiry."Person" includes an individual, partnership, association, corporation, organization, or any  other combination or group of individuals."State officer" includes all elected officers and directors of the executive branch of  state government. §3-1D-2. Certification to Secretary of State regarding foreign donations; penalties for failure to provide certification; penalties for providing inaccurate certification; duty to obtain, maintain and audit records. (a) Foreign nationals are prohibited from contributing to or participating in any ballot measure campaigns in this state.(b) At least 10 business days before any person other than a government entity enters into any agreement, membership, or program with any government entity to provide funds or in-kind goods or services for election administration, the person shall provide a certification to the Secretary of State stating whether the person is knowingly the recipient, directly or indirectly, of foreign donations. The certification provided to the Secretary of State shall:(1) State whether the person is knowingly the recipient, directly or indirectly, of foreign donations;(2) Be renewed on an annual basis;(3) Be updated within five business days of the person obtaining information unknown at the time of the initial certification to reflect whether the person is knowingly the recipient, directly or indirectly, of foreign donations; and(4) Be dated and sworn by the person under penalty of perjury.(c) Knowingly failing to provide an accurate or updated certification within the prescribed timeframe constitutes a misdemeanor with a fine of three times the amount of the donation plus court costs. If conduct that constitutes an offense under this section also constitutes an offense under any other law, the actor may be prosecuted under this section, the other law, or both.(d) In addition to the penalties described in §3-1D-2(b), failure to provide the certification or providing an inaccurate certification to the Secretary of State prior to entering into any agreement, membership, or participating in a program with a state, county, or local government entity will invalidate any agreement, membership, or participation in any  program and bar the state, county, or local entity from entering or continuing any  agreement, membership, or participation in any program with the person.(e) The Secretary of State shall maintain records of the certifications described in subsection (a). The Secretary of State shall publish these certifications on its website.(f) The Secretary of State shall require government entities to provide the Secretary of State with a quarterly report listing any person or persons who are providing or have provided funds or in-kind goods or services for election administration. The Secretary of State shall audit the lists provided to ensure compliance with the certification requirement.(g) The Secretary of State shall propose legislative rules for promulgation in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to implement and administer the provisions of this section. (h) Any existing or future ordinance enacted or adopted by a county, a municipality, or any other local governmental entity which is in conflict with this article is void.§3-1D-3. Enforcement and private cause of action. (a) The Attorney General may initiate proceedings relating to a knowing violation of this article.  Such proceedings may include, without limitation, an injunction, a civil penalty up to three times the amount of the donation, and all court costs for each knowing violation and additional relief in a district court in the county where the state capitol is situated. The Attorney General may issue investigative demands, issue subpoenas, administer oaths and conduct hearings in the court investigating a violation of the provisions of §3-1D-2(a).(b) In addition to the penalties provided in §3-1D-3(a), any person that violates the provisions of §3-1D-2(a) shall be subject to all penalties provided in §3-1D-2(b) and §3-1D-2(c). The remedies available in this section are cumulative and in addition to any other remedies available by law.(c) Any state officer or other person registered to vote in the state may bring a civil action to:(1) Enjoin a violation of this chapter; (2) Enforce any provision of this chapter; or(3) Bring both such actions.(d) If a claimant prevails in an action brought under §3-1D-3(c), the court shall award:(1) Injunctive relief sufficient to prevent the defendant from violating this article or engaging in acts that aid or abet violations of this article;(2) Statutory damages in the amount of $1,000 per day from the date of noncompliance until the date the defendant comes into compliance with the provisions of this article; and(3) Court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.(e) The remedies, duties, and prohibitions and penalties of this article are in addition to all other causes of action, remedies and penalties provided by law. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home